Hawaii statutes.
[§431K-7.1] Registration fees and service
fees of purchasing groups. (a) A purchasing group that intends to do
business in this State shall pay an initial registration fee of $300 to the
commissioner and shall thereafter pay annually a service fee of $150 on or
before August 16 of each year in which the purchasing group intends to do
business in this State.

(b) If the service fee is not paid on or
before August 16 of the year in which payment is due, a penalty shall be
imposed in the amount of fifty per cent of the service fee. The commissioner
shall provide written notice of the delinquency of payment and the imposition
of the authorized penalty. If the service fee and the penalty are not paid
within thirty days immediately following the date of the notice of delinquency,
the commissioner may revoke the registration of the purchasing group and may
not reinstate the registration until the service fee and the penalty have been
paid. [L 2015, c 63, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next